Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.181

City council—Oath—Meetings.

The city council and mayor shall meet in January next succeeding the date of each general municipal election, and shall take the oath of office, and shall hold regular meetings at least once during each month but not to exceed one regular meeting in each week, at such times as may be fixed by ordinance.

Special meetings may be called by the mayor by written notice as provided in RCW 42.30.080. No ordinances shall be passed or contract let or entered into, or bill for the payment of money allowed at any special meeting.

All meetings of the city council shall be held at such place as may be designated by the city council. All final actions on resolutions and ordinances must take place within the corporate limits of the city. All meetings of the city council must be public.

[ 1993 c 199 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.24.180. Prior: 1915 c 184 s 10, part; 1893 c 70 s 3; 1890 p 181 s 113; RRS s 9123, part. Formerly RCW 35.24.180.]